engine/dictionaries/is/is.aff
FLAG num
# Sagnbeyging 01 vb -ði j
SFX 335 N 103
SFX 335 a i .	138
SFX 335 a ir .	139
SFX 335 a ir .	140
SFX 335 a jum .	141
SFX 335 a jið .	142
SFX 335 a ja .	143
SFX 335 a i .	144
SFX 335 a ir .	145
SFX 335 a i .	146
SFX 335 a jum .	147
SFX 335 a ið .	148
SFX 335 a i .	149
SFX 335 a ði .	150
SFX 335 a ðir .	151
SFX 335 a ði .	152
SFX 335 a ðum .	153
SFX 335 a ðuð .	154
SFX 335 a ðu .	155
SFX 335 a ði .	156
SFX 335 a ðir .	157
SFX 335 a ði .	158
SFX 335 a ðum .	159
SFX 335 a ðuð .	160
SFX 335 a ðu .	161
SFX 335 0 st .	162
SFX 335 a ist .	163
SFX 335 a ist .	164
SFX 335 a ist .	165
SFX 335 a jumst .	166
SFX 335 a ist .	167
SFX 335 a jast .	168
SFX 335 a ist .	169
SFX 335 a ist .	170
SFX 335 a ist .	171
SFX 335 a jumst .	172
SFX 335 a ist .	173
SFX 335 a ist .	174
SFX 335 a ðist .	175
SFX 335 a ðist .	176
SFX 335 a ðist .	177
SFX 335 a ðumst .	178
SFX 335 a ðust .	179
SFX 335 a ðust .	180
SFX 335 a ðist .	181
SFX 335 a ðist .	182
SFX 335 a ðist .	183
SFX 335 a ðumst .	184
SFX 335 a ðust .	185
SFX 335 a ðust .	186
SFX 335 ga g .	187
SFX 335 a ðu .	188
SFX 335 a ið .	189
SFX 335 0 ndi .	190
SFX 335 a t .	191
SFX 335 a st .	192
SFX 335 a ður .	193
SFX 335 a ð .	194
SFX 335 a t .	195
SFX 335 a ðir .	196
SFX 335 a ðar .	197
SFX 335 a ð .	198
SFX 335 a ðan .	199
SFX 335 a ða .	200
SFX 335 a t .	201
SFX 335 a ða .	202
SFX 335 a ðar .	203
SFX 335 a ð .	204
SFX 335 a ðum .	205
SFX 335 a ðri .	206
SFX 335 a ðu .	207
SFX 335 a ðum .	208
SFX 335 a ðum .	209
SFX 335 a ðum .	210
SFX 335 a ðs .	211
SFX 335 a ðrar .	212
SFX 335 a ðs .	213
SFX 335 a ðra .	214
SFX 335 a ðra .	215
SFX 335 a ðra .	216
SFX 335 a ði .	217
SFX 335 a ða .	218
SFX 335 a ða .	219
SFX 335 a ðu .	220
SFX 335 a ðu .	221
SFX 335 a ðu .	222
SFX 335 a ða .	223
SFX 335 a ðu .	224
SFX 335 a ða .	225
SFX 335 a ðu .	226
SFX 335 a ðu .	227
SFX 335 a ðu .	228
SFX 335 a ða .	229
SFX 335 a ðu .	230
SFX 335 a ða .	231
SFX 335 a ðu .	232
SFX 335 a ðu .	233
SFX 335 a ðu .	234
SFX 335 a ða .	235
SFX 335 a ðu .	236
SFX 335 a ða .	237
SFX 335 a ðu .	238
SFX 335 a ðu .	239
SFX 335 a ðu .	240

# Sagnbeyging 01 vb j -ti
SFX 336 N 103
SFX 336 ja i .	138
SFX 336 ja ir .	139
SFX 336 ja ir .	140
SFX 336 a um .	141
SFX 336 ja ið .	142
SFX 336 a a .	143
SFX 336 ja i .	144
SFX 336 ja ir .	145
SFX 336 ja i .	146
SFX 336 a um .	147
SFX 336 ja ið .	148
SFX 336 ja i .	149
SFX 336 ja ti .	150
SFX 336 ja tir .	151
SFX 336 ja ti .	152
SFX 336 ja tum .	153
SFX 336 ja tuð .	154
SFX 336 ja tu .	155
SFX 336 ja ti .	156
SFX 336 ja tir .	157
SFX 336 ja ti .	158
SFX 336 ja tum .	159
SFX 336 ja tuð .	160
SFX 336 ja tu .	161
SFX 336 0 st .	162
SFX 336 ja ist .	163
SFX 336 ja ist .	164
SFX 336 ja ist .	165
SFX 336 a umst .	166
SFX 336 ja ist .	167
SFX 336 0 st .	168
SFX 336 ja ist .	169
SFX 336 ja ist .	170
SFX 336 ja ist .	171
SFX 336 a umst .	172
SFX 336 ja ist .	173
SFX 336 ja ist .	174
SFX 336 ja tist .	175
SFX 336 ja tist .	176
SFX 336 ja tist .	177
SFX 336 ja tumst .	178
SFX 336 ja tust .	179
SFX 336 ja tust .	180
SFX 336 ja tist .	181
SFX 336 ja tist .	182
SFX 336 ja tist .	183
SFX 336 ja tumst .	184
SFX 336 ja tust .	185
SFX 336 ja tust .	186
SFX 336 kja k .	187
SFX 336 ja tu .	188
SFX 336 ja ið .	189
SFX 336 0 ndi .	190
SFX 336 ja t .	191
SFX 336 ja st .	192
SFX 336 ja tur .	193
SFX 336 ja t .	194
SFX 336 ja t .	195
SFX 336 ja tir .	196
SFX 336 ja tar .	197
SFX 336 ja t .	198
SFX 336 ja tan .	199
SFX 336 ja ta .	200
SFX 336 ja t .	201
SFX 336 ja ta .	202
SFX 336 ja tar .	203
SFX 336 ja t .	204
SFX 336 ja tum .	205
SFX 336 ja tri .	206
SFX 336 ja tu .	207
SFX 336 ja tum .	208
SFX 336 ja tum .	209
SFX 336 ja tum .	210
SFX 336 ja ts .	211
SFX 336 ja trar .	212
SFX 336 ja ts .	213
SFX 336 ja tra .	214
SFX 336 ja tra .	215
SFX 336 ja tra .	216
SFX 336 ja ti .	217
SFX 336 ja ta .	218
SFX 336 ja ta .	219
SFX 336 ja tu .	220
SFX 336 ja tu .	221
SFX 336 ja tu .	222
SFX 336 ja ta .	223
SFX 336 ja tu .	224
SFX 336 ja ta .	225
SFX 336 ja tu .	226
SFX 336 ja tu .	227
SFX 336 ja tu .	228
SFX 336 ja ta .	229
SFX 336 ja tu .	230
SFX 336 ja ta .	231
SFX 336 ja tu .	232
SFX 336 ja tu .	233
SFX 336 ja tu .	234
SFX 336 ja ta .	235
SFX 336 ja tu .	236
SFX 336 ja ta .	237
SFX 336 ja tu .	238
SFX 336 ja tu .	239
SFX 336 ja tu .	240

#Fallbeyging karlmannsnafn 01
SFX 601 N 5
SFX 601 ur s/526 ur
SFX 601 n s/526 nn
SFX 601 0 s/526 u[^r]
SFX 601 0 s/526 n[^n]
SFX 601 0 s/526 [^un].

#Fallbeyging karlmannsnafn 01a
SFX 602 N 4
SFX 602 0 s/526 [^u]r
SFX 602 0 s/526 [^u][^r]
SFX 602 0 s/526 u[^r]
SFX 602 ur s/526 ur

#Fallbeyging karlmannsnafn 01 n
SFX 603 N 2
SFX 603 n s/526 nn
SFX 603 l s/526 ll

#Fallbeyging karlmannsnafn 04
SFX 604 N 1
SFX 604 r s/526
